Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Account is abolished. Any  unexpended
balance remaining in the Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Account on the  operative date of
this section shall be refunded to insurers in  a manner determined by the Department of
Consumer and Business Services to be fair and equitable.
SECTION 2.  Section 26, chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 26.  The Oregon Medical Insurance Pool [ and the Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Account
are] is  abolished. On the operative  date of this section, the tenure of office of the members of the
Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Board ceases.
SECTION 3.  Section 27, chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 27.  Before the operative date of  section 26 , [ of this 2013 Act ] chapter 698, Oregon Laws
2013, the Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Board shall pay  all valid outstanding claims against the
Oregon Medical Insurance  Pool. [ Any balances of amounts remaining in the Oregon Medical Insur-
ance Pool  Account after the payment of claims shall be refunded to insurers in a manner determined
by the board to be fair and equitable. ]
SECTION 4.  Section 42, chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2013, as  amended by section 20, chapter 640,
Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 42. [(1) ORS 414.868, 414.872, 735.614, 735.640 and 746.222 and section 1, chapter 803, Oregon
Laws 2009, are repealed January 1, 2014. ]
[(2)] Sections 1, 2, 4 and 4a, chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2013,  and ORS 735.600, 735.605, 735.610,
[735.612,] 735.615, 735.616, 735.620,  735.625, 735.630, 735.635, 735.645 and 735.650 are repealed July
1, 2017.
SECTION 5.  ORS 735.612 is amended to read:
735.612. (1) There is established in the  State Treasury, the Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Ac-
count, which shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Interest earnings from the investment of moneys in the account.
(c) Assessments and other revenues collected or received by the  Oregon Medical Insurance Pool
Board.
Enrolled House Bill 3398 (HB 3398-A) Page 1
(2) All moneys in the Oregon Medical  Insurance Pool Account are continuously appropriated to
the [ Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Board to carry out  the provisions of ORS 735.600 to 735.650 and
sections 1, 2 and 4, chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2013, and for the program, administered by  the Oregon
Health Authority and overseen by the board, that facilitates health insurance coverage through March
31, 2014, for individuals who were enrolled in pool coverage under ORS 735.600 to 735.650 on De-
cember 31, 2013 ] Department of Consumer and Business Services .
[(3) The Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Board shall  transfer to the Oregon Health Authority
Fund established in ORS 413.101 an amount  equal to the operating budget authorized by the Legisla-
tive Assembly or as that budget may be  modified by the Emergency Board or the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, for operation of the Oregon Medical Insurance Pool Board. ]
SECTION 6.
ORS 735.612 is repealed on January 2, 2018.
SECTION 7. Section 1 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on November 1, 2017.
SECTION 8. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 21, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3398 (HB 3398-A) Page 2